Alabama, session 2026rs, SB201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) BONA FIDE CHANGE IN DUTY STATION OR RESIDENCE. A
required relocation pursuant to military orders, whether
temporary or permanent, that necessitates that the service
member obtain lodging outside the normal commuting area of the
member's principal residence.
(2) COVERED MILITARY SERVICE. Active duty military
service by a member of the Armed Forces of the United States,
including a member of the reserve components or the Alabama
National Guard, who is:
a. Serving on active duty under federal authority; or
b. Serving on active duty under state authority
Page 1

b. Serving on active duty under state authority
SB201 Engrossed
pursuant to an order of the Governor or other lawful state
authority, when the service requires a bona fide change in
duty station or residence.
(b) Commencing with the 2026-2027 school year, a local
board of education shall provide access to Junior Reserve
Officers' Training Corps (JROTC) programs offered in any
school within the local school system to any student who
resides within the attendance zone of the local school system,
who is either home schooled or enrolled in a private school,
who is the dependent of an active duty military parent
performing covered military service, and who otherwise
satisfies all applicable eligibility requirements for
participation in the program, provided that the home schooled
student enrolls as a nontraditional public school student.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on July 1,
2026.
Page 2

2026.
SB201 Engrossed


Senate
Read for the first time and referred ................21-Jan-26
to the Senate committee on Veterans,
Military Affairs and Public Safety

Read for the second time and placed ................12-Feb-26
on the calendar:
1 amendment

Read for the third time and passed ................24-Feb-26
as amended
Yeas 32
Nays 0
Abstains 0


Patrick Harris,
Secretary.

Page 3